Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,110.02
Examining board; members; residence; qualifications.

Each member of the examining board who is a professional land surveyor shall be a resident of the State of Nebraska for at least one year immediately preceding his or her appointment to the examining board, shall have been engaged in the active practice of the discipline for at least ten years, and shall have been in responsible charge of work for at least five years prior to his or her appointment to the examining board.

Laws 1971, LB 442, § 4;

Laws 1994, LB 874, § 4;

Laws 2024, LB102, § 22.
September 1, 2024